Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.
Sec. 18.56.090.
General powers and limitations.

In addition to other powers granted in this chapter, the corporation may, for the purpose of providing housing for persons of lower and moderate income or persons located in remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas of the state and for its other corporate purposes,

make or participate in the making of mortgage loans to sponsors, developers, builders, and purchasers of residential housing, if the corporation determines that

mortgage loans are not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions; and

the residential housing for which the mortgage loans are made complies with applicable provisions of AS

18.56.096(c)

and the applicable thermal and lighting energy standards of AS

46.11.040

;

purchase or participate in the purchase of mortgage loans made to sponsors, developers, builders, owners, and purchasers of residential housing, if the corporation

has given approval before the initial making of the loan and has determined that mortgage loans were, at the time the approval was given, not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions; or

has determined that

the purchase or participation will result in additional residential housing, taking into account without limitation such factors as reinvestment of the proceeds of the sale in additional mortgage loans, increased availability of mortgage loans insured by the federal government, its agencies or departments, the reduction, if any, of interest payments to be made with respect to mortgage loans, or such other factors as will tend to increase or improve the supply of residential housing within the state; and

the residential housing covered by the mortgage loan complies with applicable provisions of AS

18.56.096(c)

and the applicable thermal and lighting energy standards of AS

46.11.040

;

make partial rental payments and mortgage interest payments under a contract with any housing owner if the payments will be applied to decrease rental or mortgage interest charges of persons of lower and moderate income or owners or purchasers of residential housing in remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas of the state;

make loans from the housing development fund;

collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing, and servicing its mortgages, loans, notes, bonds, certificates, commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness;

acquire real property, or any interest in real property, in its own name, by purchase, transfer, or foreclosure, when the acquisition is necessary or appropriate to protect any loan in which the corporation has an interest; sell, transfer, and convey the property to a buyer; and, if the sale, transfer, or conveyance cannot be effected with reasonable promptness or at a reasonable price, rent or lease the property to a tenant pending the sale, transfer, or conveyance;

sell, at public or private sale, to any purchaser, including the Federal National Mortgage Association, all or any part of a mortgage or other instrument or document securing a construction, land development, mortgage, or temporary loan of any type permitted by this chapter;

purchase, in order to meet the requirements of the sale of its mortgages to the Federal National Mortgage Association, stock of the Federal National Mortgage Association;

procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operation;

consent to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms, of the mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, construction loan, temporary loan, contract, or agreement of any kind to which the corporation is a party;

borrow money as provided in this chapter to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes, and issue its obligations as evidence of borrowing;

include in any borrowing the amounts necessary to pay financing charges, interest on the obligations for a period not exceeding one year after the date on which the corporation estimates funds will otherwise be available to pay the interest, consultant, advisory, and legal fees, and other expenses that are necessary or incident to this borrowing;

under AS

18.56.088

, adopt and publish regulations respecting its lending programs and other regulations that are necessary to effectuate its purposes;

provide technical and advisory services to sponsors, builders, and developers of residential housing and to residents of it;

promote research and development in scientific methods of constructing low-cost and energy-efficient residential housing of high durability;

make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation under this chapter, including contracts with any person, firm, corporation, governmental agency, or other entity;

receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any appropriation or gift, grant, or donation of property or money;

sue and be sued in its own name;

adopt an official seal;

adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and adopt regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, and other consultants and employees that may be required in the judgment of the corporation, and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the corporation;

do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter;

invest or reinvest, subject to its contracts with noteholders and bondholders, any money or funds held by the corporation in any obligations or other securities or investments in which banks or trust companies in the state may legally invest funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, and in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by obligations of, or guaranteed by, the state or the United States;

purchase a mortgage loan made to refinance an existing mortgage loan, without regard to whether the corporation holds the existing mortgage loan, as long as the interest rate and fees charged to the borrower are sufficient to fully reimburse the corporation for all costs incurred by the corporation in purchasing the mortgage loan and as long as the borrower will be in compliance with AS

18.56.096(a)(6)

after purchase of the mortgage loan by the corporation;

participate in the making of mortgage loans to borrowers for congregate housing under AS

18.56.100(b)(1)

as the purchaser of those loans; loans made for congregate housing under this paragraph must reflect application of prudent underwriting standards and lending practices that include, but are not limited to, appropriate loan-to-value ratios and the ability of a borrower to repay the loan;

participate in the development of buildings or units that, by their use, address homelessness but that, by their operation, appear nonresidential in nature;

provide financial assistance to prevent homelessness, including prevention of foreclosures and evictions;

provide financial assistance to support housing retention services or facilitate transition from dependency on low-cost housing;

participate with appropriate sponsoring agencies or groups in demonstration housing projects that address homelessness;

authorize, under AS

18.56.230

, certain commercial uses in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation.

The corporation may, subject to (c) of this section,

reserve money to itself, or provide money for, or provide deferred loans, interest rate subsidies, building subsidies, participation financing through housing partnerships, and other forms of housing assistance as set out in regulations of the corporation to, another governmental agency, a municipality, a regional housing authority, or a private nonprofit organization, to pay for the design, construction, development, rehabilitation, or improvement of housing for persons of low and moderate income, for housing in remote, undeveloped, or blighted areas of the state, and for congregate and special needs housing;

provide money for, and provide deferred loans, interest rate subsidies, building subsidies, participation financing through housing partnerships, and other forms of housing assistance as set out in regulations of the corporation to, corporations and project sponsors for congregate and special needs housing; and

receive money for a purpose described in (1) or (2) of this subsection.

The corporation may not provide money or another form of housing assistance authorized by (b) of this section unless the board identifies in the corporation’s proposed operating budget the money available to the corporation, including the corporation’s own assets, for the proposed housing assistance. The provisions of this subsection apply to

subsidies authorized by the home ownership assistance program under AS

18.56.091

;

mortgage subsidies authorized by the graduated payment mortgage loan program under AS

18.56.098(c)

;

interest rate deductions authorized in the housing development fund under AS

18.56.100(b)(1)

and (l);

money or another form of housing assistance payable from corporate earnings or assets of the corporation, other than money appropriated to the corporation for the specific purpose, for a program set out in AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.850

.

Notwithstanding authority granted by AS 18.55 and this chapter, the corporation may not acquire or construct a building for the corporation’s own use and occupancy unless the proposed acquisition or construction has been approved by the legislature by law.

In furtherance of its corporate purpose, the corporation may, in cooperation with the Alaska Energy Authority, provide technical assistance to municipalities related to residential and commercial building energy codes and energy efficiency standards.

In (a) of this section “homelessness” means the state of an individual who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, and includes an individual who

is sharing the housing of other individuals because of loss of housing, economic hardship, domestic violence, or a similar reason;

is living in a motel, hotel, trailer park, or camping ground because of the lack of alternative adequate accommodations;

is living in an emergency or transitional shelter;

is abandoned in a hospital;

is waiting for a foster care placement;

has a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings;

is living in a car, a park, a public space, an abandoned building, substandard housing, a bus or train station, or a similar setting;

is fleeing a domestic violence situation, does not have an alternative residence, and lacks the resources and support needed to obtain housing;

is being evicted within a week, does not have an alternative residence, and lacks the resources and support needed to obtain housing;

is being discharged within a week from an institution, including a mental health treatment facility, substance abuse treatment facility, or prison, in which the individual has been a resident for more than 30 consecutive days, does not have an alternative residence, and lacks the resources and support needed to obtain housing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1972; am §§ 6, 7 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 21 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 51 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 1990; am § 92 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 60 SLA 2008; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f); relettered in 2010 at which time subsection (e) was relettered as subsection (f).

In 2013, the reference to AS

18.56.230

was substituted for a reference to AS 18.56.340 in paragraph (30), to conform to the 2013 renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

In accordance with (d) of this section, § 5(a) and (b), ch. 46, SLA 2010, provide legislative approval of the corporation’s acquisition of certain buildings for its own use.
See § 5, ch. 46, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of assets, see 15 AAC 150, art. 4.

For senior housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 5.

For multi-family, special needs, and congregate housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 6.

For homeless assistance grants, see 15 AAC 154, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 101, ch. 138, SLA 1986, provides:
“Notwithstanding the provisions of
AS

18.56.090

(3) and (24) [now
AS

18.56.090

(a)(2)(A) and (B)(i) and (a)(23)], the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation may prepay at par value any debt owed the state and may purchase at par value home mortgage loans from the housing assistance loan fund ( AS 44.47.380), in an amount not to exceed $70,000,000, from the Department of Revenue, in an amount not to exceed $15,000,000, and from the Veterans’ Revolving Loan Fund ( AS 26.15), in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 60, SLA 2008 (SB 231), addressing issues of homelessness in Alaska, see 2008 Senate Journal 1616 — 1617.

Sec. 18.56.091.
Home ownership assistance program.

The corporation shall implement a home ownership assistance program to assist persons of lower and moderate income to purchase homes financed under the special mortgage loan purchase program by providing a subsidy to the persons in an amount not greater than the difference between

the amount annually required to pay interest and principal on that person’s loan and real property taxes and insurance for the home purchase with the loan; and

25 percent of that person’s annual gross income.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the loan amount eligible for assistance under the subsidy authorized by (a) of this section is the amount determined under AS

18.56.098(k)

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 128 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For definitions applicable to this section, see AS

18.56.098(k)

.

Administrative Code. —

For qualified mortgage bonds, see 15 AAC 151, art. 2.

For home ownership fund, see 15 AAC 151, art. 4.

Sec. 18.56.092.
Veterans’ loans for residential housing. [Repealed, § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980. For current provisions see AS 18.56.101.]

Sec. 18.56.093.
Insurance.

There is established in the corporation the housing insurance fund, the rural housing hazard insurance fund, and the rural housing title insurance fund. The funds shall be completely segregated from all other funds of the corporation, and are trust funds for the uses and purposes of this section. The corporation may adopt regulations under AS

18.56.088

and enter into agreements with respect to the exercise of any power relating to the funds under this section, including, without limitation, agreements as to the use of the money in the funds, agreements with respect to the terms and conditions upon which payments from the funds must be made to the corporation with respect to mortgage loans insured under this section, agreements as to accounts or subaccounts in the funds for different categories of loans, and agreements regarding the payment of and security for bonds of the corporation. The corporation may pledge, assign, or grant other interests in the funds as may be necessary or appropriate in connection with the insurance of mortgage loans and to provide for the payment of and security for bonds of the corporation.

In addition to any other fees and charges that the corporation may charge on mortgage loans, the corporation may collect, or cause to be collected, insurance commitment fees and insurance premiums on mortgage loans insured by a fund under this section.

A mortgage loan purchased by the corporation as part of its special mortgage loan purchase program may be insured by the housing insurance fund, and a mortgage loan on a mobile home or residence located in a remote, underdeveloped, blighted, or rural area of the state may also be insured (1) against hazard loss by the rural housing hazard insurance fund when hazard insurance from other sources satisfactory to private mortgage lenders is not, in the opinion of the corporation, available on reasonable terms, and (2) against title defect by the rural housing title insurance fund when title insurance from other sources satisfactory to private mortgage lenders is not, in the opinion of the corporation, available on reasonable terms. The endorsement of the corporation on the mortgage that it is insured by any fund under this section at the time of purchase or acquisition of the mortgage loan is conclusive evidence that the mortgage loan is insured under the provisions of this section by the fund.

Mortgage loans may be insured by a fund or an account in a fund under this section only when the amount in the fund or in the account as a percentage of the sum of all mortgage loans to be insured and all unpaid principal on mortgage loans to be insured by the fund or the account equals or exceeds the fund requirement. The fund requirement for each fund or account shall be calculated as the percentage that the corporation determines is actuarially sound for operation of the fund or account.

When the corporation determines what is actuarially sound with respect to the operation of each fund or account in a fund, it shall consider means of providing sufficient revenue for the operation of the fund or account, without regard to amounts that may have been or may, after the date of determination of actuarial soundness, be appropriated under (f) of this section and it shall consider factors which must include, without limitation,

as to the mortgages insured by the housing insurance fund, or an account of the housing insurance fund, estimates of future defaults and losses on mortgage loans insured under this section based on actual default and loss experience on those mortgage loans or on similar mortgage loans in this state or elsewhere, estimates of recoveries on defaulted or foreclosed mortgage loans based on that experience, the terms and conditions of the mortgage loans insured under this section, estimates of earnings and income of amounts on deposit in the fund, and any other appropriate factors;

as to mortgages insured by the rural housing title insurance fund, estimates of defaults and losses by reason of title defects that are otherwise uninsured, estimates of earnings and income of amounts of deposit in the fund or the account, and any other appropriate factors; and

as to mortgages insured by the rural housing hazard insurance fund, or an account of the rural housing hazard insurance fund, estimates of default by reason of hazard losses which are otherwise uninsured, estimates of earnings and income of amounts on deposit in the fund or the account, and any other appropriate factors.

On December 1 of each year the corporation shall ascertain the amount on deposit in each fund established under this section and in each account of each fund. If the amount in any fund or account is less than the fund requirement for the fund or account, the corporation shall, no later than January 2 of the following year, certify in writing to the governor and to the legislature, the amount, if any, required to restore that fund or account to the fund requirement. The legislature may appropriate the amount and the corporation shall deposit in the fund or account all amounts appropriated during the then current state fiscal year. Nothing in this subsection creates a debt or liability of the state.

History.

(§ 22 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.094.
New capital city mortgage loans.
[Repealed, § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 18.56.095.
Mortgage insurance.

There is a special fund of the state to be known as the “state mortgage insurance fund” (called the “mortgage insurance fund”) which shall be completely segregated and set apart from all other funds of the state, and which is a trust fund for the uses and purposes of this section and into and from which money shall be paid as provided in this section. The mortgage insurance fund shall be held by the commissioner of revenue, subject to the power of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development to enter into and perform agreements with respect to the use of money in the mortgage insurance fund and to pledge, assign, or grant interests in the mortgage insurance fund as provided in this section. The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may enter into agreements with the corporation with respect to the exercise of any power or approval relating to the mortgage insurance fund under this section, including, without limitation, agreements as to the use of money in the mortgage insurance fund, agreements with respect to the terms and conditions upon which payments from the mortgage insurance fund shall be made to the corporation with respect to mortgage loans insured under this section, and agreements regarding the payment of and security for mortgage insurance bonds, and in connection with these agreements the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may pledge, assign, or grant other interests in the mortgage insurance fund to the corporation as may be necessary or appropriate in connection with the insurance of mortgage loans and to provide for the payment of and security for mortgage insurance bonds. Any such agreement or any of the rights of the corporation under the agreement and payments received or to be received under the agreement may be pledged or assigned by the corporation for the benefit of the holders of mortgage insurance bonds.

In addition to any other fees and charges that the corporation may charge on mortgage loans, it may collect or cause to be collected on all mortgage loans made or purchased with the proceeds of the sale of mortgage insurance bonds, either or both a special mortgage loan insurance commitment fee or a mortgage loan insurance premium. The special mortgage loan insurance commitment fees and special mortgage loan insurance premiums when received shall be deposited in the mortgage insurance fund by the corporation, or by any mortgage loan servicer, trustee, or agent designated by the corporation to receive them, and shall be held, invested and, together with all investment income derived from them, reinvested by the commissioner of revenue as set out in AS

37.10.071

, subject to any agreement with the corporation under (a) of this section.

If, at any time after receipt by the corporation of a payment from the mortgage insurance fund with respect to a mortgage loan or any portion of the principal and interest and other amounts payable on a mortgage loan, the corporation recovers an amount on the mortgage loan or portion of it from any source other than the mortgage insurance fund, it shall apply the amount recovered in the following order: first to repay the general fund of the state to the extent of appropriations made pursuant to requests made under (f) of this section, and second, to repay the mortgage insurance fund.

A mortgage loan may be insured if the loan-to-value ratio at the time of the insurance loan does not exceed 80 percent or, if the loan-to-value ratio does exceed that percentage, if it is federally insured or guaranteed or insured by a qualified mortgage insurance company to the extent of the excess. The endorsement of the corporation on the mortgage at the time of purchase or acquisition of the mortgage loan is conclusive evidence that the mortgage loan is insured under the provisions of this section. The insurance is payable solely from the mortgage insurance fund.

Mortgage loans may only be insured when the amount in the mortgage insurance fund as a percentage of the sum of all mortgage loans to be insured and all unpaid principal on mortgage loans insured by the corporation equals or exceeds the fund requirement. As used in this section, the fund requirement is calculated as follows as to the following mortgage loans insured by the corporation:

in the case of federally insured or guaranteed mortgage loans, or mortgage loans insured by a qualified mortgage insurance company or, if not so insured or guaranteed, with a loan-to-value ratio at the time of the mortgage insurance application less than 80 percent, the greater of (A) two percent of the unpaid principal amount of those mortgage loans, or (B) a percentage that the corporation with the approval of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development determines is actuarially sound for operation of the mortgage insurance fund;

[Repealed, § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980.]

On December 1 of each year the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall determine the amount on deposit in the mortgage insurance fund. If the amount in the fund is less than the fund requirement, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall request the corporation to transfer from any available funds the amount necessary to restore the mortgage insurance fund to the fund requirement and the corporation shall promptly comply with the request from any funds available subject to agreements with holders of any of its obligations. If sufficient funds are not provided as the result of the requests, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall, no later than January 2 of the following year, make and deliver to the governor and to the chairmen of the house and senate finance committees a certificate stating the sum required to restore the fund to the fund requirement and the sum so certified may be appropriated and paid to the fund during the then current state fiscal year. Nothing in this subsection creates a debt or liability of the state.

[Repealed, § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980.]

In this section, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning,

the determination of what is “actuarially sound” with respect to the operation of the mortgage insurance fund shall be based on a consideration of the factors that will provide sufficient revenue for the operation of the fund, without regard to amounts that may have been or may, after the date of determination of actuarial soundness, be appropriated pursuant to (f) of this section, including, without limitation, estimates of future defaults and losses on mortgage loans insured under this section based on actual default and loss experience on those mortgage loans or on similar mortgage loans in this state or elsewhere, estimates of recoveries on defaulted or foreclosed mortgage loans based on that experience, the terms and conditions of the mortgage loans insured under this section, estimates of earnings and income of amounts on deposit in the mortgage insurance fund, and any other appropriate factors;

“loan-to-value ratio” means the ratio between the principal amount of a mortgage loan and the appraised value, as determined by the corporation, of the residential housing financed by the mortgage loan;

“mortgage insurance bond” means a bond, note, or other obligation of the corporation, the proceeds of which are authorized to be expended to purchase or make a mortgage loan insured under this section;

“qualified mortgage insurance company” means a mortgage insurance company satisfactory to the corporation;

“special mortgage loan insurance commitment fee” and “special mortgage loan insurance premium” mean, respectively, a fee of a percent of the principal amount of a mortgage loan to be insured under this section, and an annual insurance premium of a percent of the portion of the unpaid principal amount of a mortgage loan insured under this section that is not federally insured or guaranteed or insured by a private mortgage insurance company, that the corporation with the approval of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development determines is actuarially sound for the operation of the mortgage insurance fund.

History.

(§ 8 ch 151 SLA 1975; am §§ 23 — 26, 77 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 141 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” throughout this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. Paragraph (h)(1) was formerly (h)(6) and paragraphs (h)(2) — (5) were formerly (h)(1) — (4); relettered in 2002.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” throughout this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 18.56.096.
Limitation on power to make or purchase mortgage loans.

The corporation may not make, participate in the making of, purchase, or participate in the purchase of

a first mortgage loan under this chapter for a duplex, triplex, or four-plex that exceeds the limitations on first mortgage loans for similar housing purchased by the Federal National Mortgage Association as to principal amount and loan-to-value ratio;

a second mortgage loan for a duplex, triplex, or four-plex the amount of which, when combined with the principal balance of a first mortgage loan on the property, exceeds the limitation on the amount set out in (1) of this subsection or that has a loan-to-value ratio, when considered with the principal balance of the first mortgage loan, that exceeds 90 percent;

a mortgage loan to finance the purchase of new housing or for the improvement or rehabilitation of existing housing, unless the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation work has been performed by a contractor who is registered to work as a contractor under AS 08.18; this paragraph does not apply if the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation work

has been totally or substantially performed by the borrower;

has been performed by a borrower who acts as the contractor for the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation work; or

has been performed in an area designated by the corporation as exempt from the requirements of this paragraph because of the unavailability of registered contractors in that area;

a first mortgage loan for a single-family residence that exceeds the limitations on first mortgage loans for similar housing purchased by the Federal National Mortgage Association as to principal amount by more than 10 percent, or has a loan-to-value ratio that exceeds 95 percent, or a second mortgage loan for a single-family residence, the amount of which, when combined with the principal balance of a first mortgage loan on the property, exceeds the limitations on loans for similar housing purchased by the Federal National Mortgage Association as to principal amount by more than 10 percent, or has a loan-to-value ratio, when considered with the principal balance of the first mortgage loan, that exceeds 90 percent;

a first or second mortgage loan for rental housing unless the borrower agrees not to discriminate against tenants or prospective tenants because of sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, national origin, or status as a student;

a first mortgage loan if the borrower has an outstanding first mortgage housing loan under this chapter or an outstanding first mortgage loan for owner-occupied housing under former provisions of AS 44.47; or

a loan to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

The loan-to-value limitation established in (a)(4) of this section does not apply to a mortgage loan that is federally insured or guaranteed. The loan-to-value limitations established in (a)(1) and (4) of this section do not apply to a mortgage loan that is a refinancing mortgage loan under AS

18.56.108

.

The corporation may not make, participate in the making of, purchase, or participate in the purchase of a loan for a residential building if construction of the building began after December 31, 1991, unless the building complies with the thermal and lighting energy standards required by AS

46.11.040

. The corporation

may adopt regulations to implement this subsection; and

shall, by regulation, establish

procedures by which the person responsible for the construction of the building may demonstrate that the building complies with the thermal and lighting energy standards, including

self-certification, if the contractor responsible for the building construction provides satisfactory evidence that the contractor has completed a training program that is satisfactory to the corporation;

submission of the certificate of a registered architect, registered engineer, or a building inspector, and the architect, engineer, or building inspector has completed a training program that is satisfactory to the corporation;

submission of the certificate of occupancy issued by the municipality in which the building is located, if the certificate is issued by a municipality in which the municipal building code meets or exceeds the thermal and lighting energy standards, as determined by the corporation;

another method approved by the corporation in regulations adopted by the corporation; and

criteria by which the energy conservation standards may be met; for purposes of this subparagraph, the residential building complies with the energy standards if the residence has received a rating under a home energy rating system adopted by the corporation that, in the judgment of the corporation, meets or exceeds the thermal energy standards required by AS

46.11.040

.

History.

(§ 27 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 18 ch 113 SLA 1982; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 112 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 128 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 116 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1990; am § 93 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 31 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to “child support services agency” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For building energy efficiency standard, see 15 AAC 155, art. 1.

For energy rated homes of Alaska, see 15 AAC 155, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 155, art. 9.

Sec. 18.56.097.
Collateral for loans.

Under procedures established by regulations of the corporation adopted in accordance with AS

18.56.088

a person may pledge as security for the repayment of a loan made, purchased, or insured by the corporation under this chapter a preference right the person holds to receive title to land the person occupies as a primary place of residence, primary place of business, subsistence campsite, or as headquarters for reindeer husbandry. The preference right must be conveyed to the person by the Native corporation to which the land was granted under 43 U.S.C. 1613 before it may be pledged as security under this section. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall prescribe procedures and standard forms for establishing and appraising the value of a preference right held by a person to secure the repayment of a loan made, purchased, or insured by the corporation under this chapter.

History.

(§ 27 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(4), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.